Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2710
Rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
to carry out the Civic
and Community Center Financing Act.

Laws 1999, LB 382, § 22;

Laws 2011, LB297, § 8.